test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     biitoosijigan: biitoosijigan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1biitoosijigan: nibiitoosijigan
     +Px2biitoosijigan: gibiitoosijigan
     +Px3biitoosijigan: obiitoosijigan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan: ibiitoosijigan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     biitoosijigan+Con: biitoosijiganenh
     biitoosijigan+Dim: biitoosijiganens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     biitoosijigan+Pos: biitoosijiganim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     biitoosijigan+Pej: biitoosijiganish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl: biitoosijiganinaan
     biitoosijigan+PosObv: biitoosijiganini
     biitoosijigan+PosPl: biitoosijiganiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     biitoosijigan+Pret: biitoosijiganiban
     biitoosijigan+VocPl: biitoosijigan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     biitoosijigan+Loc: biitoosijiganing
     biitoosijigan+Obv: biitoosijiganan
     biitoosijigan+Pl: biitoosijiganag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con: nibiitoosijiganenh
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim: nibiitoosijiganens
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con: gibiitoosijiganenh
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim: gibiitoosijiganens
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con: obiitoosijiganenh
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim: obiitoosijiganens
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con: ibiitoosijiganenh
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim: ibiitoosijiganens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos: nibiitoosijiganim
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos: gibiitoosijiganim
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos: obiitoosijiganim
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pos: ibiitoosijiganim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pej: nibiitoosijiganish
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pej: gibiitoosijiganish
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pej: obiitoosijiganish
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej: ibiitoosijiganish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl: nibiitoosijiganinaan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+PosObv: nibiitoosijiganini
     +Px1biitoosijigan+PosPl: nibiitoosijiganiwaa
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl: gibiitoosijiganinaan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+PosObv: gibiitoosijiganini
     +Px2biitoosijigan+PosPl: gibiitoosijiganiwaa
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl: obiitoosijiganinaan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+PosObv: obiitoosijiganini
     +Px3biitoosijigan+PosPl: obiitoosijiganiwaa
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pos1Pl: ibiitoosijiganinaan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+PosObv: ibiitoosijiganini
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+PosPl: ibiitoosijiganiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pret: nibiitoosijiganiban
     +Px1biitoosijigan+VocPl: nibiitoosijigan***idig, idog***
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pret: gibiitoosijiganiban
     +Px2biitoosijigan+VocPl: gibiitoosijigan***idig, idog***
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pret: obiitoosijiganiban
     +Px3biitoosijigan+VocPl: obiitoosijigan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pret: ibiitoosijiganiban
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+VocPl: ibiitoosijigan***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Loc: nibiitoosijiganing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Obv: nibiitoosijiganan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Pl: nibiitoosijiganag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Loc: gibiitoosijiganing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Obv: gibiitoosijiganan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Pl: gibiitoosijiganag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Loc: obiitoosijiganing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Obv: obiitoosijiganan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Pl: obiitoosijiganag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Loc: ibiitoosijiganing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Obv: ibiitoosijiganan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pl: ibiitoosijiganag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos: biitoosijiganenhim
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos: biitoosijiganensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej: biitoosijiganenhish
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej: biitoosijiganensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl: biitoosijiganenhinaan
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv: biitoosijiganenhini
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl: biitoosijiganenhiwaa
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: biitoosijiganensinaan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv: biitoosijiganensini
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl: biitoosijiganensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pret: biitoosijiganenhiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+VocPl: biitoosijiganenh***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pret: biitoosijiganensiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+VocPl: biitoosijiganens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     biitoosijigan+Con+Loc: biitoosijiganenhing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Obv: biitoosijiganenhan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pl: biitoosijiganenhag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Loc: biitoosijiganensing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Obv: biitoosijiganensan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pl: biitoosijiganensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej: biitoosijiganimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl: biitoosijiganiminaan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv: biitoosijiganimini
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl: biitoosijiganimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pret: biitoosijiganimiban
     biitoosijigan+Pos+VocPl: biitoosijiganim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Loc: biitoosijiganiming
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Obv: biitoosijiganiman
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pl: biitoosijiganimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl: biitoosijiganishinaan
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv: biitoosijiganishini
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl: biitoosijiganishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pret: biitoosijiganishiban
     biitoosijigan+Pej+VocPl: biitoosijiganish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Loc: biitoosijiganishing
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Obv: biitoosijiganishan
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pl: biitoosijiganishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganiniiban
     biitoosijigan+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganini***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganinaanag
     biitoosijigan+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganiniing
     biitoosijigan+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganinian
     biitoosijigan+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganiniag
     biitoosijigan+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganibanag
     biitoosijigan+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijigan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijigan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijigan***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pos: nibiitoosijiganenhim
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos: nibiitoosijiganensim
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos: gibiitoosijiganenhim
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos: gibiitoosijiganensim
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos: obiitoosijiganenhim
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos: obiitoosijiganensim
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Pos: ibiitoosijiganenhim
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos: ibiitoosijiganensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pej: nibiitoosijiganenhish
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej: nibiitoosijiganensish
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pej: gibiitoosijiganenhish
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej: gibiitoosijiganensish
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pej: obiitoosijiganenhish
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej: obiitoosijiganensish
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Pej: ibiitoosijiganenhish
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pej: ibiitoosijiganensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl: nibiitoosijiganenhinaan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv: nibiitoosijiganenhini
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl: nibiitoosijiganenhiwaa
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: nibiitoosijiganensinaan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv: nibiitoosijiganensini
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl: nibiitoosijiganensiwaa
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhinaan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv: gibiitoosijiganenhini
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl: gibiitoosijiganenhiwaa
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: gibiitoosijiganensinaan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv: gibiitoosijiganensini
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl: gibiitoosijiganensiwaa
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl: obiitoosijiganenhinaan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv: obiitoosijiganenhini
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl: obiitoosijiganenhiwaa
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: obiitoosijiganensinaan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv: obiitoosijiganensini
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl: obiitoosijiganensiwaa
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl: ibiitoosijiganenhinaan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+PosObv: ibiitoosijiganenhini
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+PosPl: ibiitoosijiganenhiwaa
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl: ibiitoosijiganensinaan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv: ibiitoosijiganensini
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl: ibiitoosijiganensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pret: nibiitoosijiganenhiban
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+VocPl: nibiitoosijiganenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pret: nibiitoosijiganensiban
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+VocPl: nibiitoosijiganens***idig, idog***
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pret: gibiitoosijiganenhiban
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+VocPl: gibiitoosijiganenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pret: gibiitoosijiganensiban
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+VocPl: gibiitoosijiganens***idig, idog***
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pret: obiitoosijiganenhiban
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+VocPl: obiitoosijiganenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pret: obiitoosijiganensiban
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+VocPl: obiitoosijiganens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Pret: ibiitoosijiganenhiban
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+VocPl: ibiitoosijiganenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pret: ibiitoosijiganensiban
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+VocPl: ibiitoosijiganens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Loc: nibiitoosijiganenhing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Obv: nibiitoosijiganenhan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pl: nibiitoosijiganenhag
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Loc: nibiitoosijiganensing
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Obv: nibiitoosijiganensan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pl: nibiitoosijiganensag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Loc: gibiitoosijiganenhing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Obv: gibiitoosijiganenhan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Con+Pl: gibiitoosijiganenhag
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Loc: gibiitoosijiganensing
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Obv: gibiitoosijiganensan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pl: gibiitoosijiganensag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Loc: obiitoosijiganenhing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Obv: obiitoosijiganenhan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Con+Pl: obiitoosijiganenhag
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Loc: obiitoosijiganensing
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Obv: obiitoosijiganensan
     +Px3biitoosijigan+Dim+Pl: obiitoosijiganensag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Loc: ibiitoosijiganenhing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Obv: ibiitoosijiganenhan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Con+Pl: ibiitoosijiganenhag
